Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 43.
[REPEALED.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which repealed this amendment effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Before repeal, this amendment read:

“Salaries and expenses of judges.

“The General Assembly shall by law determine the amount and method of payment of salaries and expenses of the judges of the Supreme Court, Circuit Courts, Chancery Courts, and Municipal Courts of Arkansas; provided such salaries and expenses may be increased but not diminished during the term for which such judges are elected; provided further that the salaries of Circuit and Chancery Judges shall be uniform throughout the state.”

Amendment 43 was proposed by initiative petition filed in the office of the Secretary of State on June 15, 1956. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 6, 1956, by a vote of 198,566 for and 155,627 against.

For current provision concerning compensation of justices and judges, see Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 31.